Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2658.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 2 TLSB 5743HV (2) 91 th/ns H.F. 2658 Section 1. Section 321.209, Code 2026, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsections: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 5A. For a first violation for participating 3 in a street takeover. 4 NEW SUBSECTION . 5B. For a second violation for 5 participating in a street takeover, and the department shall 6 not grant an application for a new license until the expiration 7 of two years after the revocation. 8 NEW SUBSECTION . 5C. For a third or subsequent violation for 9 participating in a street takeover, and the department shall 10 not grant an application for a new license until the expiration 11 of four years after the revocation. 12 Sec. 2. NEW SECTION . 321.277B Street takeovers. 13 1. A person shall not participate in a street takeover. 14 a. For a first violation, a person commits a simple 15 misdemeanor punishable by a fine of at least five hundred 16 dollars but not to exceed two thousand dollars and the 17 department shall revoke the personâs driverâs license in 18 accordance with section 321.209, subsection 5A. 19 b. For a second violation, a person commits a serious 20 misdemeanor. The court shall impose a fine of at least two 21 thousand five hundred dollars but not to exceed four thousand 22 dollars and the court may also order imprisonment not to exceed 23 one year. The department shall revoke the personâs driverâs 24 license in accordance with section 321.209, subsection 5B. 25 c. For a third or subsequent violation, a person commits a 26 class âDâ felony. The court shall impose a fine of at least 27 three thousand five hundred dollars but not to exceed seven 28 thousand five hundred dollars and the court may also order 29 imprisonment not to exceed five years. The department shall 30 revoke the personâs driverâs license in accordance with section 31 321.209, subsection 5C. 32 d. A peace officer shall impound the motor vehicle used in 33 a street takeover for thirty days. An unclaimed motor vehicle 34 impounded under this paragraph is subject to section 321.89. 35 -1- LSB 5743HV (2) 91 th/ns 1/ 3 H.F. 2658 2. A person shall not organize a street takeover. A person 1 who violates this subsection commits a serious misdemeanor. 2 3. A person shall not spectate at a street takeover. 3 A person who violates this subsection commits a simple 4 misdemeanor punishable as a scheduled violation under section 5 805.8A, subsection 9, paragraph â0eâ . 6 4. If a person spectating at or participating in a street 7 takeover blocks or prevents a peace officer from intervening in 8 any manner, the person commits interference with official acts, 9 in violation of section 719.1, and upon conviction, shall be 10 imprisoned for not less than two days in addition to any other 11 penalty. 12 5. For purposes of this section, âstreet takeoverâ means an 13 event involving the operation of a motor vehicle in violation 14 of section 321.277, 321.277A, or 321.278, with at least three 15 motor vehicles present or one or more spectators present. 16 Sec. 3. Section 805.8A, subsection 9, Code 2026, is amended 17 by adding the following new paragraph: 18 NEW PARAGRAPH . 0e. Section 321.277B . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 400. 19